Washington statutes.
RCW 3.62.090

Public safety and education assessment—Amount.

(1) There shall be assessed and collected in addition to any fines, forfeitures, or penalties assessed, other than for parking infractions, by all courts organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW a public safety and education assessment equal to seventy percent of such fines, forfeitures, or penalties, which shall be remitted as provided in chapters 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, and 35.20 RCW. The assessment required by this section shall not be suspended or waived by the court.

(2) There shall be assessed and collected in addition to any fines, forfeitures, or penalties assessed, other than for parking infractions and for fines levied under RCW 46.61.5055, and in addition to the public safety and education assessment required under subsection (1) of this section, by all courts organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, an additional public safety and education assessment equal to fifty percent of the public safety and education assessment required under subsection (1) of this section, which shall be remitted to the state treasurer and deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The additional assessment required by this subsection shall not be suspended or waived by the court.

(3) This section does not apply to the fee imposed under RCW 46.63.110(7), the penalty imposed under RCW 46.63.110(8), the additional penalty imposed under RCW 46.20.500, the additional fine imposed under RCW 46.61.110, 46.61.145, 46.61.180, 46.61.185, 46.61.190, and 46.61.205, or the penalty assessment imposed under RCW 10.99.080. This section does not apply to the additional monetary penalties under RCW 46.61.165.

[ 2019 c 467 s 5; 2019 c 403 s 11; 2019 c 65 s 5; 2004 c 15 s 5; 2003 c 380 s 1; 2001 c 289 s 1; 1997 c 331 s 4; 1995 c 332 s 7; 1994 c 275 s 34; 1986 c 98 s 4; 1984 c 258 s 337.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2019 c 65 s 5, 2019 c 403 s 11, and by 2019 c 467 s 5, without reference to one another. All amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Finding—Intent—2019 c 467: See note following RCW 46.20.289.

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2019 c 403: See notes following RCW 46.04.071.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 65: See notes following RCW 46.81A.020.

Intent—2004 c 15: See note following RCW 10.99.080.

Effective date—1997 c 331: See note following RCW 70.168.135.

Severability—Effective dates—1995 c 332: See notes following RCW 46.20.308.

Short title—Effective date—1994 c 275: See notes following RCW 46.04.015.

Effective date—1986 c 98 s 4: "Section 4 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect May 1, 1986." [ 1986 c 98 s 5.]

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Intent—1984 c 258: See note following RCW 3.34.130.